Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General
§ 33-24-123.
Revocation or suspension of license and registration; proceedings; informal resolution.

Except as provided by subsections (b) and (c) of this section, proceedings under W.S.

33-24-122

may be taken by the board from matters within its knowledge, or may be taken upon the information of others; provided however, that if the informant is a member of the board, the other members of said board shall constitute the board for the purpose of finding judgment of the accused. The board shall, if it deems the charge sufficient, give notice by mail to the accused of facts or conduct which warrant the intended action, and afford the accused a hearing, as provided by law. All hearings or proceedings hereunder shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. If the accused does not appear, the board may proceed and determine the accusation in his absence. If the accused pleads guilty, or, upon the hearing the board shall find the causes alleged, or any of them to be true, it may proceed to judgment and may either revoke his registration and license, or merely revoke his license or suspend it for a specified period of time, or condition any of such sanctions on such future active or passive conduct of the offender as the board shall determine is reasonable, provided that such remedies are not exclusive and shall be in addition to other remedies provided by law. Upon revocation of any registration or license, the fact shall be noted upon the records of the board of pharmacy and the license shall be marked as cancelled upon the date of its revocation.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the executive director may subject to board approval and upon mutual agreement with a licensee, informally resolve violations of W.S. 33-24-122(a) and impose administrative penalties authorized under W.S. 33-24-122(b) in lieu of the proceedings specified under subsection (a) of this section. If the board disapproves the agreement and informal resolution, the agreement shall not:

Constitute any admission by the licensee;

Be admissible in any subsequent proceeding under this act;

Prohibit the director from filing a formal complaint;

Prohibit the licensee from contesting or objecting to a formal complaint filed by the director or from appealing the decision of the board.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, no appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-311; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 24; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.24; Laws 1995, ch. 23, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 ALR2d 1210.

Hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

§ 33-24-124.
Persons deemed practicing pharmacy.

Any person shall be deemed to be practicing pharmacy within the meaning of this act who provides collaborative pharmaceutical care or prepares, or compounds, or processes, or packages, or repackages, or labels, or dispenses, or sells, or offers for sale, at retail or in connection with operation of a health-care facility, any dangerous drugs, medicines, poisons, chemicals, narcotics, or prescriptions, which are identified as such in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.25; Laws 1999, ch. 101, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-125.
Dangerous substances; generally.

Dangerous drugs, medicines, poisons, chemicals, and narcotics include only those drugs, chemicals, poisons, medicines and other substances which are intended for use by man:

Which are habit forming; or

Which because of toxicity or other potentiality for harmful effect, or method of use, or the collateral measures necessary to its use, are not safe for use except under the supervision of a practitioner licensed by law to prescribe such substances; or

Which are designated as dangerous substances under the provisions of W.S.

33-24-131

; and which are named and thereby included on a list of dangerous drugs, medicines, poisons, chemicals and narcotics compiled by the board of pharmacy and by them filed with the department of health. The board will provide a complete current copy of such list to all persons requesting same at cost.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.26; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of pharmacist who accurately fills prescription for harm resulting to user, 44 ALR5th 393.

§ 33-24-126.
Dangerous substances; compilation of list.

In compiling such list of dangerous substances, and determining which substances shall be included thereon, and in adding substances thereto, and in deleting substances therefrom, the board shall consider all information which shall come to its attention from reasonably reliable sources and shall compile the list making use of such information about, experience with, and knowledge of (or lack of knowledge of or about) each substance and shall include, add or delete each substance as the accumulation of such information, experience, knowledge, or lack thereof, shall indicate according to the definitions and guidelines provided in W.S.

33-24-125

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.27.

§ 33-24-127.
Adoption of certain publications by reference; list of dangerous substances open to public inspection; petition to add or delete substances from list.

The board is authorized to adopt, by reference if feasible, in whole or in part the United States Pharmacopoeia, the National Formulary, and supplements thereto and later editions thereof, and lists of drugs the traffic in which is restricted by federal law, provided always:

That a complete copy of the current list shall be always open to the public inspection at the department of health; and

Any citizen may petition the board in writing to add or to delete any substance to or from the list, which petition shall be considered by the board after providing the petitioner reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard thereon. The board may consider treatises and scientific reports without requiring formal foundations or proofs thereof, and may accept or reject the conclusions therein or deductible therefrom as deemed best in the light of the professional knowledge and experience of the individual members of the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.28; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-24-128.
Appeal from decisions of board as to list of dangerous drugs.

Appeal from decisions of the board relating to composition of, additions to or deletions from the list of dangerous drugs shall be had initially to the advisory council to the department of health, the decision of which advisory council shall be final unless appealed by either the pharmacy board or the petitioner to the courts of this state. All appeals shall be conducted as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. No board shall be concluded by decisions of any previous board as to a particular substance, provided that the board shall not be obliged to consider the same substance more than once during any twelve (12) month period.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.29; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-24-129.
Exempted professions.

This act does not apply to physicians, dentists, veterinarians, podiatrists, optometrists, osteopaths or midwives licensed by law to practice their professions within this state or to other persons authorized by federal law and state law to treat sick and injured persons in Wyoming and to use controlled substances in the course of treatment.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 33-321; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 30; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.30; Laws 1975, ch. 94, § 1; Laws 1981, ch. 105, § 1; 1987, ch. 139, § 1; 2010, ch. 46, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “osteopaths or midwives” for “or osteopaths.”

Laws 2010, ch. 46, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-130.
Exemptions; administration of drugs and medicine.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the provisions of this act do not apply to administration of drugs and medicines, or to persons engaged in the administration of drugs and medicines. Administration of drugs and medicines, for the purpose of this exclusion, is hereby defined as actual, personal distribution to, or injection in, or application to a particular human being, of substances or material which has already been prepared, selected, measured, packaged, and labeled, or otherwise specifically identified by a person qualified to do so under the terms of this act.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 33-321; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 31; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.31; Laws 2006, ch. 121, § 2.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “Unless otherwise provided by law.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-131.
Exemptions; sale of certain articles.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to the sale at wholesale or sale by any method at retail of economic poisons, medical and dental supplies, cosmetics, dietary foods, or nonnarcotic, nonprescription, prepackaged medicinal preparations contained in distinctive and original unbroken containers, when such medicinal preparations are identified by and sold under a trade name of the manufacturer or primary distributor thereof and are sold or offered for sale to the general public, if such articles meet the requirements of state and federal food, drug and cosmetic laws; provided however, that notwithstanding the above, any drug, medicinal preparation, or substance for use by man which is determined by the state board of pharmacy, after notice to the manufacturer or primary distributor thereof, and opportunity to be heard pursuant to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

], as having a depressant or stimulant effect on the central nervous system or its hallucinogenic effect, or as habit forming, or as a drug or product which, because of its toxicity or other potentiality for harmful effect, or method of use, or the collateral measures necessary for such use is not safe for use except under the supervision of a practitioner licensed by law to prescribe such substances, may be designated by rule as a dangerous drug which shall be restricted to sale on prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to prescribe such substances.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 33-321; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 32; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.32.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-132.
Existing pharmacists exempted; license renewals. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 33-309; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 33; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.33; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 33-24-133.
Association with boards of pharmacy of other jurisdictions.

In order to be informed and to determine the status of boards of pharmacy of other jurisdictions which desire to effect arrangements for reciprocal registration of pharmacists, and in order to also be advised regarding fitness of applicants, and of the progress and changes in pharmacy throughout the country, the board may annually select at least one (1) of its members to meet with like representatives from other jurisdictions, and may join in creating and maintaining an association for such mutual ends, and in its discretion the board may contribute such information as it possesses which is useful to such aims and objects. Additionally, the board may subscribe for and secure the services of associations engaged in the compilation of pharmaceutical information, knowledge and progress, specially adapted to secure excellence and efficiency in the work of the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.34; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “may annually select at least one(1)” for “may annually select one(1).”

§ 33-24-134.
Reciprocity.

The board, in its sole discretion, may license as a pharmacist in this state without examination, any person who proposes to practice pharmacy in this state who is duly licensed by examination in some other state. An applicant for a license pursuant to this section shall:

Submit an application in the form and containing information as prescribed by the board;

Meet the qualifications specified in W.S. 33-24-116(a)(ii) through (iv);

Have engaged in the practice of pharmacy for a period of at least one (1) year or have met the requirements of W.S. 33-24-116(a)(v) within one (1) year immediately preceding the date of application;

Have been a licensed pharmacist by examination in another state;

Submit evidence that the applicant’s license to practice pharmacy in any other state has not been suspended, revoked or otherwise restricted for any reason other than nonrenewal or the failure to obtain the required continuing education credits;

Pay the fees specified in board regulations for licensure by reciprocity;

Provide the board with fingerprints, necessary fees and other information required to perform a criminal history record background check as provided for by W.S.

7-19-201

. The board may delay issuing a license pending its receipt of the information from the background check;

Have passed an examination regarding applicable federal and state statutes and regulations relating to the practice of pharmacy in Wyoming.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 211, § 2.

The board may issue a temporary pharmacist license, provided the applicant has met those requirements in paragraphs (i) through (vii) of subsection (a) of this section as well as other requirements established by the board. A temporary pharmacist license shall not be effective for a period of more than six (6) months from the date of issuance and shall not be renewed. The board may charge a fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for issuance of a temporary pharmacist license. A pharmacist with a temporary license may be disciplined as provided by W.S.

33-24-122

and

33-24-123

.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-308; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 35; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.35; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2007, ch. 211, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a), in part by adding (i) through (viii); repealed former (b) through (d), pertaining to reciprocal registration; deleted “has submitted to the board an official application including payment of fees for registration by reciprocity and” following “provided the applicant” in (e), and inserted “paragraphs (i) through (vii) of.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in the beginning of (a)(i), substituted “an application” for “a written application.”

§ 33-24-135.
Internship.

The internship or practical experience requirement for registration as a pharmacist in this state shall consist of no more than two thousand (2,000) and no less than one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours experience in a pharmacy or related setting. Hours shall be accumulated after the completion of the first professional year in an approved college or school of pharmacy or, for those applicants who have graduated from a foreign college of pharmacy, completed a transcript verification program, taken and passed a college of pharmacy equivalency exam program and completed a communication ability test as provided in board regulations. Hours of internship experience accumulated may be determined by the board.

The board is hereby empowered to promulgate and enforce such reasonable regulations as may from time to time appear necessary to provide that interns shall receive broad training in all aspects of the profession during internship, and that each intern shall keep a record thereof during a portion of the training reflecting his work and experience and whether it conforms to the requirements of the board.

The service and experience rendered and gained during internship must be predominantly related to the preparing, compounding, processing, packaging, labeling, and dispensing of the restricted substances, selling or offering the same for sale at retail, keeping records in regard thereto, and making reports required by law in regard thereto, all under the personal guidance and supervision of a preceptor.

Each prospective intern shall be licensed by the board upon payment of a fee and shall register by application giving the intern’s name and address. Under its regulations the board may provide for consideration and acceptance of internship served in other jurisdictions.

The board may issue a letter of admonition or suspend or revoke a pharmacy intern’s license for any:

Willful violation of any provision of this chapter or the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971;

Willful violation of any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter or the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971;

Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor that relates to the practice of pharmacy or to the ability to practice as a pharmacy intern;

Action which threatens the public health, safety or welfare; or

Knowing submission of false or misleading information to the board in the application for an initial or renewal license.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.36; Laws 1973, ch. 140, § 1; 1993, ch. 30, § 2; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2015 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) inserted “or, for those applicants who have graduated from a foreign college of pharmacy, completed a transcript verification program, taken and passed a college of pharmacy equivalency exam program and completed a communication ability test as provided in board regulations” following “college or school of pharmacy”; added (e).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (d).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (e)(iii), substituted “that relates to the practice of pharmacy or to the ability to practice as a pharmacy intern” for “involving moral turpitude” following “misdemeanor.”

§ 33-24-136.
Filing memorandum of prescription; labels generally; prescription defined; counseling and patient profiles.

Every person who prepares, compounds, processes, packages or repackages, dispenses, fills or sells or offers for sale, at retail or in connection with operation of a health care facility, any prescription, shall place the written or electronic record of the prescription in a separate file marked and kept for that purpose, and shall affix a label to the container in which the prescribed substance is dispensed bearing the name and address of the pharmacy and initials of the dispensing pharmacist, or of the preceptor if the dispenser is an intern, the date on which the prescription is filed in the pharmacy’s files, the name of the person who prescribed the substance, the name of the patient or customer for whom the prescription was made and directions for use by the patient as directed on the prescription by the practitioner.

“Prescription” means an order for medication by a person licensed and authorized by the state board of medicine, the state board of dental examiners, the state board of nursing, the state board of registration in podiatry, the state board of examiners in optometry or the state board of veterinary medicine which is dispensed to or for an ultimate user, but does not include an order for medication which is dispensed for immediate administration to the ultimate user. Each prescription record shall be maintained and available for inspection by agents of the board for a period of two (2) years from the date it is filed.

Pharmacists shall offer to and shall counsel patients if requested, concerning and in conjunction with drugs dispensed pursuant to a new prescription.

Pharmacies shall maintain patient profile records of the dispensing of drugs pursuant to a prescription.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, if, in the opinion of the pharmacist, an emergency exists whereby the practitioner who ordered or prescribed the prescription cannot be contacted for authorization and there is a need to refill the prescription, the pharmacist may provide up to a seventy-two (72) hour supply, or the smallest available unit, of the previously prescribed drug, except a controlled substance. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require a pharmacist to refill the prescription in the absence of authorization from the practitioner.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 33-316; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 37; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.37; Laws 1973, ch. 140, § 1; 1975, ch. 194, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; ch. 152, § 1; 1993, ch. 30, § 2; 1997, ch. 100, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, § 1; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2015 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to use of medication aides at the state training school, see §

25-5-135

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “initials” for “registration number” following “and address of the pharmacy and.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “or electronic record” for “memorandum”, in (b), substituted “record” for “memorandum” and “available” for “open.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, at the end of (a), substituted “practitioner” for “prescriber”; and in (e), substituted “practitioner who ordered or prescribed” for “prescriber of” following “whereby the” and “practitioner” for “prescriber” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

Licensing requirements for dentists are now established by the state board of dental examiners. See §

33-15-101

.

§ 33-24-137.
Sale of poison. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 33-320; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 38; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.38; repealed by 2015 ch. 166, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 33-24-138.
“Poison” labels. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 33-319; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 39; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.39; repealed by 2015 ch. 166, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 33-24-139.
Supervision of preparation of drugs.

No person shall manufacture, make, produce, package, pack or prepare within this state any drugs, medicines, medical supplies, chemicals or poisons, for human treatment or medication except under the personal and immediate supervision of a registered pharmacist, chemist, pharmaceutical chemist or such other person who may be approved by the board after investigation and determination that he is qualified by scientific or technical training or experience to perform the duties of supervision as may be necessary to protect the public health and safety.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 33-323; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 40; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.40.

§ 33-24-140.
Code of ethics.

The board shall propose, and with the advice of the practicing licensees in this state shall adopt and from time to time amend or revise, a comprehensive code of ethics for the profession of pharmacy the review of which shall become obligatory on all applicants for license or renewal thereof.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.41; Laws 1973, ch. 140, § 1.

§ 33-24-141.
Use of letters “RPh” or word “pharmacist”.

Whenever any person shall append the letters “RPh” or word “pharmacist” or such similar designation to his name in any way, for advertising, or upon any card, stationery, door or sign, or occasion either of the same to be done, the same shall be prima facie evidence that the person is subject to the regulations and convictions and penalties of this act.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 42; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.42; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, deleted “engaged in the practice of pharmacy and” preceding “subject to the regulations,” made a related change, and made a stylistic change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-142.
Penalty.

Any person who practices pharmacy, as defined in this act, without being properly qualified and licensed as required, or who violates any of the other provisions of this act shall be subject to criminal prosecution, and upon conviction may be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. Each separate violation of this act shall constitute a separate offense; provided, that upon a second or subsequent conviction, such person shall be subject to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), and imprisonment of not more than six (6) months.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 33-324; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 43; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.43.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-143.
Prosecutions.

It shall be the duty of the district attorney for the county where the violation occurs to attend to the prosecution of all criminal complaints made under this act, both upon the trial in the circuit court where the complaint may be made, and also upon hearings in the district court, either upon such complaint, or upon the information or indictment filed against any person under this act. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent the prosecution of any person for violation of this act upon the information of the district attorney directly.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 33-325; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 44; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.44; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “justice or” following “upon the trial in the.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-144.
Injunction.

When it appears to the board that any person is violating any of the provisions of this act, the board may, in its own name, bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for an injunction, and courts of this state may enjoin any person from violation of this act regardless of whether proceedings have been or may be instituted before the board or whether criminal proceedings have been or may be instituted. Such proceedings shall be prosecuted by the attorney general or, if approved by the attorney general, by private counsel engaged by the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 45; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.45.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-145.
Powers and duties of agents, inspectors and board members.

The board, its agents and inspectors may specially, but not exclusively, examine and inspect all activities in this state undertaken in compliance with W.S.

33-24-101

through

33-24-301

which appear to be contrary to or in violation of W.S.

33-24-101

through

33-24-301

, to procure enforcement and to check for violations and provide for enforcement of related federal laws and regulations. The inspectors may also determine if practitioners’ records are adequately kept in a manner reflecting professional responsibility and may provide legislative recommendations if records are not found to be adequately maintained.

The board, its agents and inspectors shall examine and inspect drug manufacturers, distributors and wholesalers, licensed pursuant to W.S.

33-24-153

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 46; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.46; 1993, ch. 204, § 1; 2007, ch. 211, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “33-24-301” for “33-24-203” following “W.S.

33-24-101

through” twice; in (b) deleted the last sentence.

§ 33-24-146.
Citation.

This act is known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Generic Drug Substitution Act”.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 35, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-147.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Brand name” means the proprietary or trade name selected by the manufacturer and placed upon a drug, its container, label or wrapping at the time of packaging;

“Generically equivalent drug” means a drug that contains identical active ingredients in the identical dosage forms, but not necessarily containing the same inactive ingredients, that meet the identical compendial or other applicable standards of identity, strength, quality and purity, including potency, and, where applicable, content uniformity, disintegration times or dissolution rates, as the prescribed brand name drug, and, if applicable, the manufacturer or distributor holds either an approved new drug application or an approved abbreviated new drug application unless other approval by law or from the Federal Food and Drug Administration is required. A generically equivalent drug shall bear an “AB” or higher rating in the Federal Food and Drug Administration Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations;

“Generic name” means the chemical or generic name, as determined by the United States Adopted Names (USAN) and accepted by the Federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA), of those drug products having the same active chemical ingredients;

“Substitute” means to dispense a generically equivalent drug or interchangeable biological product in place of the prescription ordered or prescribed;

“Therapeutically equivalent” means drugs that will provide the same bioavailability or bioequivalence when administered to an individual in the same dosage regimen;

“Biological product” means as defined in 42 U.S.C. 262(i)(1);

“Interchangeable biological product” means a biological product that the United States food and drug administration has:

Licensed and determined meets the standards for interchangeability under 42 U.S.C. 262(k)(4); or

Determined is therapeutically equivalent to the prescription ordered or prescribed, as set forth in the latest edition or supplement to the Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations (Orange Book) issued by the United States food and drug administration.

“This act” means W.S.

33-24-146

through

33-24-151

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 35, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, § 1; 2018 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iv), substituted “drug or interchangeable biological product in place of the prescription” for “product in place of the dangerous substance” following “generically equivalent”; added (a)(vi) and (a)(vii); and redesignated former (a)(vi) as present (a)(viii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-24-148.
Conditions for drug substitution.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 54, § 2.

Except as limited by W.S. 33-24-149(b) or when the practitioner has clearly indicated substitution is not permitted, a pharmacist may substitute:

A drug product with the same generic name in the identical strength, quantity, dose and dosage form as the prescribed drug, provided the substituted product or drug meets all requirements specified in W.S. 33-24-147(a)(ii);

An interchangeable biological product.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 54, § 2.

A pharmacist may not substitute a generically equivalent drug unless it has been manufactured with the following minimum manufacturing standards and practices by a manufacturer who:

Marks capsules and tablets with an identification code or monogram;

Labels products with their expiration date;

Maintains reasonable resources for product information;

Maintains recall capabilities for unsafe or defective drugs.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 54, § 2.

When a practitioner orally communicates a prescription and prohibits substitution of an interchangeable biological product or generically equivalent drug, the pharmacist shall make reasonable efforts to obtain a written prescription from the practitioner with the phrase “brand medically necessary” written on the face of the prescription in his own handwriting.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 35, § 1; 1981, ch. 51, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, §§ 1, 2; 2018 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (b)(ii), redesignated part of the existing language as present (b)(i), in present (b)(i), inserted “product or” following “provided the substituted”; in (e), substituted “generically equivalent drug” for “drug product” preceding “unless”; in (g), substituted “substitution of an interchangeable biological product or generically equivalent drug” for “a generic substitution” following “prohibits”; and made related changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-24-147(a)(vi).